Washington statutes.
RCW 35.20.280

City trial court improvement account—Contribution by city to account—Use of funds.

Any city operating a municipal court under this chapter that receives state contribution for municipal court judges' salaries under RCW 2.56.030 shall create a city trial court improvement account. An amount equal to one hundred percent of the state's contribution for the payment of municipal judges' salaries shall be deposited into the account. Money in the account shall be used to fund improvements to the municipal court's staffing, programs, facilities, or services, as appropriated by the city legislative authority.

[ 2005 c 457 s 5.]

NOTES:

Intent—2005 c 457: See note following RCW 43.08.250.